District of Columbia statutes.
38-2307

Repealed

Property rights; outstanding obligations; conveyances.

Repealed.

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 3
Sept. 13, 1960, 74 Stat. 917, Pub. L. 86-776, § 4
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1807.
1973 Ed., § 31-1027.